Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Annual Supplement, 201546-1142
Failure to notify of accident; penalty; recovery of costs.

Any permitholder who fails to notify the district and the department of any actual or suspected accident resulting from the use of chemigation shall be (1) subject to a civil penalty of one thousand dollars for each day at each site where a violation occurs for the first violation and not less than one thousand dollars and not more than five thousand dollars for each day at each site where a violation occurs for each subsequent violation or (2) guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Each day of continued violation shall constitute a separate offense. The court may issue such injunctive orders as may be necessary to prohibit continued violations of the Nebraska Chemigation Act. When the Attorney General, a county attorney, or a private attorney brings an action on behalf of a district to recover a civil penalty under this section, the district shall recover the costs of the action if a civil penalty is awarded.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 42;

Laws 2015, LB207, § 4.
August 30, 2015